Utah statutes.
79-4-604.   Iron Mission Historical Monument -- Acquisition of property.

The division may:

(1)  acquire, construct, maintain, and operate any land areas, objects, or structures as necessary to preserve, protect, display, and enhance:

(a)  the gifts described in Section 79-4-603; and

(b)  other historical objects or collections donated, loaned, or otherwise acquired that appropriately contribute to the pioneer heritage of Utah; and

(2)  acquire, directly or through others, by purchase, contract, lease, permit, donations, or otherwise, all real or personal property, rights-of-way, approach roads, parking and other areas, structures, facilities and services that the division and board may consider necessary or desirable to accomplish Subsection (1).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

